en: roasted turkey including natural turkey juices
de: Gebratener Truthahn mit natürlichen Truthahnsäften
it: tacchino arrosto con succhi naturali di tacchino

en: goose
bg: гъска
de: Gans
es: ganso
fr: oie
hr: guska
nl: gans, ganzen
pl: gęś, gęsi, gęsia, gęsie

en: goose meat
bg: гъше месо
de: Gänsefleisch
fr: viande d'oie
hr: guščje meso
it: carne d'oca
pl: mięso gęsi

en: goose liver
bg: гъши дроб
de: Gänseleber
es: hígado de ganso
fr: foie d'oie
hr: guščja jetra
it: fegato d'oca
nl: ganzenlever
nn: gåselever
ru: гусиная печень
sv: gåslever

en: quail
bg: пъдпъдък
de: Wachtel
fr: caille, cailles
hr: prepelica
it: quaglia
nl: kwartel, kwartels
pl: przepiórka, przepiórki, przepiórczy, przepiórcze, przepiórcza

en: partridge
bg: яребица
de: Rebhuhn
es: perdiz
fr: perdrix, perdreaux
hr: jarebica
it: pernice
pl: kuropatwa, kuropatwy

en: egg, eggs
af: eier
ak: Kosua
am: እንቁላል
ar: بيض, بيضة
az: yumurta
ba: Йомортҡа
be: яйка
bg: яйце, яйца
bm: Syɛfan
bn: ডিম
br: Vi
ca: ou
cs: vejce
cy: ŵy
da: æg, aeg
de: Ei, Eier, Eiern
ee: koklozi
el: αυγό, αυγά
eo: ovo
es: huevo, huevos
et: Muna, munad
eu: arrautza
fa: تخم‌مرغ
fi: muna, munat
fr: œuf, œufs, oeuf, oeufs, 6 oeufs, 4 oeufs
ga: uibheacha, ubh
gl: ovo
gv: Ooh
he: ביצה
hi: अण्डा
hr: jaja, iz jaja
hu: tojás
hy: Ձու
id: telur
io: ovo
is: egg
it: uova, uovo
ja: 卵, 玉子, たまご, タマゴ, エッグ
ka: კვერცხი
ko: 알
ky: Жумуртка
li: Ei
lt: kiaušiniai, kiaušinis
lv: ola, olas
mk: јајце
mr: अंडी
ms: telur
mt: bajd
nb: egg
ne: फुल
nl: ei, eieren
nn: egg
no: egg
oc: uòu
or: ଅଣ୍ଡା
pa: ਆਂਡਾ
pl: jajo, jajko, jaja, jajka, jajeczny, jajeczne, jajeczna, jaj, jajowa
pt: ovo, ovos
ro: ou, ouă, oua
ru: яйцо, яйца
rw: Igi
sh: Jaje
si: බිත්තරය
sk: vajce, vajcia
sl: jajca, jajce
so: Ukun
sr: jaja
sv: ägg
ta: முட்டை ஓா் உணவு
te: గుడ్డు
th: ไข่
tl: itlog
tr: yumurta
uk: яйце
ur: انڈا
vi: trứng
wa: Oû
zh: 雞蛋

en: egg flavour
ca: aroma d'ou
de: Eiaroma, Ei-Aroma
es: aroma de huevo
hr: okus jaja
it: aroma di uovo

en: large eggs
bg: големи яйца
da: store æg
de: große Eier, Eier groß
fi: suuri muna, suuret munat
fr: gros oeufs
hr: velika jaja
it: uova grandi
nl: grote eieren

en: free range eggs, free range whole egg
bg: яйца от свободни кокошки
de: Freilandeier
es: Huevos de corral, huevos de gallinas criadas en el suelo
fi: ulkomunat
fr: Oeufs d'élevage en plein air, Oeufs élevés en plein air, oeufs plein air, œufs d'élevage en plein air
hr: jaja slobodnog uzgoja
it: uova da allevamento a terra, Uova di allevamento all'aperto
ja: 平飼い卵
nl: vrije-uitloopei, vrije uitloop ei
pl: jaja z wolnego wybiegu, jajka z wolnego wybiegu, jaja z chowu na wolnym wybiegu

en: category A eggs
bg: яйца категория А
de: Eier Güteklasse A, Güteklasse A Eier, Eier Klasse A
es: Huevos clase A, huevos categoría A
fr: oeufs de categorie A
hr: jaja kategorije a
it: uova di categoria A, uova categoria A, uova cat a
nl: categorie A eieren

en: fresh category A eggs
bg: пресни яйца категория А
de: frische Eier Klasse A
fr: oeufs frais de catégorie A
hr: svježa jaja kategorije a
it: uova fresche di categoria A, uova fresche categoria A, uova fresche cat a
nl: verse categorie A eieren

en: eggs from Switzerland
de: Schweizer Eier, 6 Schweizer Eier, 4 Schweizer Eier
fr: oeufs suisses, 6 oeufs suisses, 4 oeufs suisses
hr: jaja iz Švicarske
it: uova svizzere, 6 uova svizzere, 4 uova svizzere
ja: スイス産卵
nl: eieren uit Zwitserland, zwitserse eieren

en: boiled egg
ar: بيض مسلوق
bg: варени яйца
ca: ou bullit
de: gekochte Eier, Gekochte Hühnereier, gekochtes Ei
eo: boligita ovo
es: huevo cocido
eu: Arrautza egosi
fi: Keitetty muna
he: ביצה מבושלת
hi: उबले हुए अंडे
hr: kuhano jaje
id: telur rebus
it: uovo sodo
ja: ゆで卵
ko: 삶은 달걀
lb: Gekachtent Ee
ms: Telur rebus
nl: gekookt ei, gekookte eieren
or: ସିଝା ଅଣ୍ଡା
pl: jaja gotowane, jajka gotowane, jajo gotowane, jajko gotowane
pt: ovo cozido
ro: ou fiert
ru: варёные яйца
th: ไข่ต้ม
uk: варене яйце
vi: Trứng luộc
zh: 水煮蛋

en: soft-boiled egg
bg: рохки яйца
fr: oeuf à la coque, œuf à la coque
hr: meko kuhano jaje
it: uovo alla coque
pl: jajko na miękko

en: hard-boiled egg
bg: твърдо сварени яйца
fr: œuf dur, œufs durs, oeuf dur, oeufs durs
gl: Ovo duro
hr: tvrdo kuhano jaje
pl: jajko na twardo

en: poached egg
bg: поширано яйце
fr: Oeuf poché
hr: poširano jaje
it: uovo in camicia

en: chicken egg
bg: кокоши яйца
cs: slepičí vejce
de: Hühnerei, Hühnereier, Hühnervollei
es: Huevo de gallina
fi: kananmuna, kananmunaa, kanamunaa
fr: œufs de poules, oeufs de poules
hr: kokošje jaje
it: uova di galline, uovo da galline, uovo di gallina, uova di gallina, uovo da gallina
ja: 鶏卵
nl: kippeneieren
pl: jajko kurze, jajo kurze, jaja kurze, jajka kurze
ru: яйцо куриное, яйца куриные
tr: tavuk yumurtası

en: organic chicken egg
de: Bio-Hühnerei, Bio-Ei
fi: luomukananmuna, luomu kananmuna, luomukanan muna, luomukanan munia
fr: œufs de poules issus de l'agriculture biologique
hr: organsko kokošje jaje
it: uovo di gallina biologico

en: eggs from caged hens
de: Eier aus Käfighaltung
fr: œufs de poules élevées en cage, oeufs de poules élevées en cage, 20 oeufs de poules élevées en cage, 6 oeufs de poules élevées en cage
hr: jaja od kokoši u kavezu
it: uova da galline allevate in gabbia
pl: jaja z chowu klatkowego